Utah statutes.
13-1-3.   Executive director.
(1)  The department shall be under the supervision, direction, and control of
the executive director of commerce.  The executive director shall be appointed
by the governor with the consent of the Senate. The executive director shall
hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall establish the
executive director's salary within the salary range fixed by the Legislature
in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.
(2)  The executive director shall employ personnel necessary to carry out the
duties and responsibilities of the department.
